West Virginia, session 2025, SB578.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14. WEST VIRGINIA COMMERCIAL FEED LAW. §19-14-5. Permits; registration. (a) Permits and registrations shall not be transferrable with respect to persons or locations.(b) A person must apply for a permit or registration at least 30 days prior to the expiration of the current permit or registration; or at least 30 days prior to the date that the person intends to engage in the business of selling or marketing commercial feed products in this state. All applications shall be accompanied by the required fee. A penalty shall be added to the fee for all permits or registrations that are not applied for or renewed within the time limit.(c) Persons manufacturing commercial feed or customer-formula feed in this state must obtain a commercial feed manufacturing permit from the commissioner, except for persons manufacturing feed for only his/her his or her animals on his/her his or her premises, or those producing pet food. Application forms shall be provided by the commissioner and include such information as established by rules. A separate permit shall be obtained for each manufacturing facility or location in this state. Each commercial feed manufacturing pemit application shall be accompanied by the required application fee. Each permit issued shall expire on December 31, next following the date of issue.(d) Each person distributing commercial feed in West Virginia must obtain a commercial feed distributor permit from the commissioner, except: (1) Persons distributing pet food exclusively,;(2) Persons holding a valid commercial feed manufacturing permit issued by the commissioner,; and (3) Persons holding a commercial feed guarantor pissued by the commissioner; and (4) Persons engaged in offering for sale, selling, exchanging, or bartering products or commodities produced exclusively on their own farms. Application forms shall be provided by the commissioner and include such information as established by rules. Each commercial feed distributor permit application shall be accompanied by the required application fee. Each permit issued shall expire on December 31, next following the date of issue.(e) Each person whose name appears on the label of a commercial feed or customer-formula feed as guarantor must obtain a commercial feed guarantor permit from the commissioner for each manufacturing facility or location that distributes feed in or into the state, except those facilities or locations for which a commercial feed manufacturing permit has already been issued by the commissioner. Application forms shall be provided by the commissioner and include such information as established by rules. Each commercial feed guarantor permit application shall be accompanied by the required application fee. Each permit issued shall expire on December 31, next following the date of issue.(f) Pet food in packages over 10 pounds or bulk shall be registered annually. Each application for registration shall be accompanied by the required registration fee. Each registration shall expire on August 31, next following the date of issue: Provided, That until June 30, 2027, an additional registration fee of $50 per product shall accompany each application for registration and the additional registration fee shall be deposited into the West Virginia Spay Neuter Assistance Fund for spay and neutering services performed within this state by licensed veterinarians.(g) Pet food packaged in packages of 10 pounds and under shall be registered annually. Each application for registration shall be accompanied by the required registration fee. Each registration shall expire on December 31, next following the date of issue: Provided, That until June 1, 2027, an additional registration fee of $35 per product shall accompany each application for registration and the additional registration fee shall be deposited into the West Virginia Spay Neuter Assistance Fund for spay and neutering services performed within this state by licensed veterinarians.(h) Specialty pet food shall be registered annually. Each application for registration shall be accompanied by the required registration fee. Each registration shall expire on December 31, next following the date of issue.(i) A person is not required to register any brand name or product name of commercial feed which is already registered by another person.(j) Alteration of a pet food or specialty pet food that changes the label requires a new application for registration be made and approved before distribution. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home